incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
      <pardef n="min/mək__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərəmmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərəmmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərler</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ərlermi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

    <e lm="bezmək"><i>bez</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="biçmək"><i>biç</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minmək"><i>min</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bükmək"><i>bük</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="büzmək"><i>büz</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çökmək"><i>çök</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dəlmək"><i>dəl</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tikmək"><i>tik</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kəsilmək"><i>kəsil</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="düzmək"><i>düz</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tökmək"><i>tök</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="burulmaq"><i>burul</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="döymək"><i>döy</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yıxılmaq"><i>yıxıl</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="əsmək"><i>əs</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eşmək"><i>eş</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="keçmək"><i>keç</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gərmək"><i>gər</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="girmək"><i>gir</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="getmək"><i>get</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="geymək"><i>gey</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gülmək"><i>gül</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="içmək"><i>iç</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enmək"><i>en</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dayandırmaq"><i>dayandır</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="küsmək"><i>küs</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ölçmək"><i>ölç</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hörmək"><i>hör</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ötmək"><i>öt</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tə'rifləmək"><i>tə'riflə</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="xəsrətini çəkmək"><i>xəsrətini<b/>çək</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bişmək"><i>biş</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="seçmək"><i>seç</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="səkmək"><i>sək</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sevmək"><i>sev</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sezmək"><i>sez</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sikmək"><i>sik</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="silmək"><i>sil</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sinmək"><i>sin</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sönmək"><i>sön</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sürmək"><i>sür</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="süzmək"><i>süz</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="şişmək"><i>şiş</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="təpmək"><i>təp</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tüstüləmək"><i>tüstülə</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yayınmaq"><i>yayın</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ürkmək"><i>ürk</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yenmək"><i>yen</i><par n="min/mək__vblex"/></e>
